Illinois, session 104th, SB654.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The War on Terrorism Compensation Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 32/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the War 8on Terrorism Compensation Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-76, eff. 7-24-09.)